Arkansas, session 2025, SB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103, concerning the signing of a
petition, penalty for falsification, and notice of suspected forgery for
initiative petitions and referendum petitions, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Secretary of State shall not count signatures collected and
witnessed by a canvasser if the Secretary of State finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that the canvasser has violated Arkansas laws regarding
canvassing, perjury, forgery, or fraudulent practices in the procurement of
petition signatures or any provision of the Arkansas Constitution applicable
to the collection of signatures on an initiative petition or referendum
petition during the current election cycle.
(2) This subsection shall not constrain the duties and authority
of the Secretary of State as set forth in Arkansas law.

*SSS128*
02/06/2025 9:21:13 AM SSS128

SB209
SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and
determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process
for citizens to propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution is critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that
it is of the utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process
be strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a
high degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as
citizens of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any
delay in the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process
for the 2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the
public peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.











02/06/2025 9:21:13 AM SSS128